Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202682-319
New state capital construction; appropriation; percentage used for works of art; when; limitation.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) or (3) of this section, all boards, agencies, commissions, or departments of state government shall spend at least one percent of any appropriation for the original construction of any state building for the acquisition of works of art.

(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply if (a) a waiver is approved pursuant to section 82-321 or (b) more than seventy-five percent of the project cost represents improvements to mechanical systems.

(3) The expenditure per project for works of art shall not exceed three hundred thousand dollars.

(4) The works of art may be:

(a) An integral part of the structure;

(b) Attached to the structure;

(c) Detached within or outside of the structure; or

(d) Exhibited by the board, agency, commission, or department in other public facilities.

Laws 1978, LB 664, § 3;

Laws 2025, LB660, § 33.